Arkansas, session 2025, HB1859.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 23-99-405 is amended to read as follows:
23-99-405. Mastectomies.
(a) Every health benefit plan providing mastectomy benefits and issued
or renewed after July 16, 2003, shall conform with the requirements of the
Women's Health and Cancer Rights Act of 1998, 42 U.S.C. §§ 300gg-6 and 300gg-
52, as it existed on January 1, 2003 January 1, 2025.
(b) To the extent the requirements of this section do not conflict
with federal law, rules, or regulations, each healthcare insurer providing
mastectomy benefits in a health benefit plan shall provide, in a manner
determined in consultation with the attending physician and the enrollee or
insured:
(1) For medical and surgical benefits for any hospital stay in
connection with a mastectomy for not less than forty-eight (48) hours unless
the decision to discharge the patient before the expiration of the minimum
length of stay is made by an attending physician in consultation with the
enrollee or insured;
(2) The following medical and surgical benefits with respect to
mastectomy coverage if an enrollee or insured receives benefits in connection
*ANS347*
03/19/2025 10:32:07 AM ANS347

HB1859
with a mastectomy and elects breast reconstruction:
(A) Surgery and reconstruction of the breast on which the
mastectomy has been performed;
(B) Surgery and reconstruction of the other breast to
produce a symmetrical appearance; and
(C) Prostheses and coverage for physical complications at
all stages of a mastectomy, including lymphedemas; and
(3) Written notice of the availability of coverage under this
section to the enrollee or insured upon enrollment and annually thereafter;
and
(4)(A) Medical and surgical benefits for:
(i) Artificial or biological mesh used to support
tissue; and
(ii) A nerve graft to preserve or restore nerve
function.
(B) A healthcare insurer, health benefit plan, or group
health plan shall reimburse a healthcare provider for the supplies required
for the healthcare services provided under subdivision (b)(4)(A) of this
section at a rate equal to or greater than one hundred percent (100%) of the
healthcare provider's acquisition cost.
(c) No healthcare A healthcare insurer providing mastectomy benefits
under this section shall not:
(1) Deny an enrollee or insured eligibility or continued
eligibility to enroll or renew coverage under the terms of the health benefit
plan solely for the purpose of avoiding the requirements of this section; or
(2) Penalize, reduce, or limit the reimbursement of an attending
provider or induce the provider to provide care in a manner inconsistent with
this section.
(d) A healthcare insurer or health benefit plan shall cover the
healthcare services under this section if the service is performed at a
licensed facility, including without limitation:
(1) A hospital;
(2) A hospital outpatient department; and
(3) An ambulatory surgery center.
(e) This section does not apply to a plan providing health benefits to
state and public school employees under § 21-5-401 et seq.
03/19/2025 10:32:07 AM ANS347

HB1859
(f) This section expires on June 30, 2031, unless extended by the
General Assembly.


































03/19/2025 10:32:07 AM ANS347